Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-304
Agricultural products, defined.

Agricultural products means field crops and horticultural, viticultural, forestry, nut, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee, and farm products, including sod grown on the land owned or rented by the farmer, and the byproducts derived from any of them.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 4.